Illinois, session 104th, HB4772.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Estate and Generation-Skipping 5Transfer Tax Act is amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 405/2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 405A-2)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. In this Act: 8    "Federal estate tax" means the tax due to the United 9States with respect to a taxable transfer under Chapter 11 of 10the Internal Revenue Code.11    "Federal generation-skipping transfer tax" means the tax 12due to the United States with respect to a taxable transfer 13under Chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code.14    "Federal return" means the federal estate tax return with 15respect to the federal estate tax and means the federal 16generation-skipping transfer tax return with respect to the 17federal generation-skipping transfer tax.18    "Federal transfer tax" means the federal estate tax or the 19federal generation-skipping transfer tax.20    "Illinois estate tax" means the tax due to this State with 21respect to a taxable transfer.22    "Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax" means the tax 23due to this State with respect to a taxable transfer that gives   HB4772- 2 -LRB104 19644 HLH 33093 b1rise to a federal generation-skipping transfer tax.2    "Illinois transfer tax" means the Illinois estate tax or 3the Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax.4    "Internal Revenue Code" means, unless otherwise provided, 5the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to 6time.7    "Non-resident trust" means a trust that is not a resident 8of this State for purposes of the Illinois Income Tax Act, as 9amended from time to time.10    "Person" means and includes any individual, trust, estate, 11partnership, association, company or corporation.12    "Qualified heir" means a qualified heir as defined in 13Section 2032A(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.14    "Resident trust" means a trust that is a resident of this 15State for purposes of the Illinois Income Tax Act, as amended 16from time to time.17    "State" means any state, territory or possession of the 18United States and the District of Columbia.19    "State tax credit" means:20    (a) For persons dying on or after January 1, 2003 and 21through December 31, 2005, an amount equal to the full credit 22calculable under Section 2011 or Section 2604 of the Internal 23Revenue Code as the credit would have been computed and 24allowed under the Internal Revenue Code as in effect on 25December 31, 2001, without the reduction in the State Death 26Tax Credit as provided in Section 2011(b)(2) or the   HB4772- 3 -LRB104 19644 HLH 33093 b1termination of the State Death Tax Credit as provided in 2Section 2011(f) as enacted by the Economic Growth and Tax 3Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, but recognizing the 4increased applicable exclusion amount through December 31, 52005.6    (b) For persons dying after December 31, 2005 and on or 7before December 31, 2009, and for persons dying after December 831, 2010, an amount equal to the full credit calculable under 9Section 2011 or 2604 of the Internal Revenue Code as the credit 10would have been computed and allowed under the Internal 11Revenue Code as in effect on December 31, 2001, without the 12reduction in the State Death Tax Credit as provided in Section 132011(b)(2) or the termination of the State Death Tax Credit as 14provided in Section 2011(f) as enacted by the Economic Growth 15and Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, but with the 16following modifications:17        (1) the exclusion amount shall be: recognizing the 18    exclusion amount of only (i) 19            (A) $2,000,000 for persons dying prior to January 20        1, 2012; ,21            (B) (ii) $3,500,000 for persons dying on or after 22        January 1, 2012 and prior to January 1, 2013; , and 23            (C) (iii) $4,000,000 for persons dying on or after 24        January 1, 2013 and before January 1, 2027; and ,25            (D) for persons dying on or after January 1, 2027, 26        the applicable exclusion amount set forth under   HB4772- 4 -LRB104 19644 HLH 33093 b1        Section 2010 of the Internal Revenue Code, including 2        any deceased spousal unused exclusion amount available 3        after a valid election is made under subparagraph (A) 4        of paragraph (5) of subsection (c) of Section 2010 of 5        the Internal Revenue Code; and 6        (2) the State tax credit shall be calculated and with 7    a reduction to the adjusted taxable estate for any 8    qualified terminable interest property election as defined 9    in subsection (b-1) of this Section.10    (b-1) The person required to file the Illinois return may 11elect on a timely filed Illinois return a marital deduction 12for qualified terminable interest property under Section 132056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of the 14Illinois estate tax that is separate and independent of any 15qualified terminable interest property election for federal 16estate tax purposes. For purposes of the Illinois estate tax, 17the inclusion of property in the gross estate of a surviving 18spouse is the same as under Section 2044 of the Internal 19Revenue Code. 20    In the case of any trust for which a State or federal 21qualified terminable interest property election is made, the 22trustee may not retain non-income producing assets for more 23than a reasonable amount of time without the consent of the 24surviving spouse. 25    "Taxable transfer" means an event that gives rise to a 26state tax credit, including any credit as a result of the   HB4772- 5 -LRB104 19644 HLH 33093 b1imposition of an additional tax under Section 2032A(c) of the 2Internal Revenue Code.3    "Transferee" means a transferee within the meaning of 4Section 2603(a)(1) and Section 6901(h) of the Internal Revenue 5Code.6    "Transferred property" means: 7        (1) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring at 8    the death of an individual, the deceased individual's 9    gross estate as defined in Section 2031 of the Internal 10    Revenue Code. 11        (2) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring as a 12    result of a taxable termination as defined in Section 13    2612(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable amount 14    determined under Section 2622(a) of the Internal Revenue 15    Code. 16        (3) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring as a 17    result of a taxable distribution as defined in Section 18    2612(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable amount 19    determined under Section 2621(a) of the Internal Revenue 20    Code. 21        (4) With respect to an event which causes the 22    imposition of an additional estate tax under Section 23    2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the qualified real 24    property that was disposed of or which ceased to be used 25    for the qualified use, within the meaning of Section 26    2032A(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.  HB4772- 6 -LRB104 19644 HLH 33093 b1    "Trust" includes a trust as defined in Section 2652(b)(1) 2of the Internal Revenue Code.3(Source: P.A. 96-789, eff. 9-8-09; 96-1496, eff. 1-13-11; 497-636, eff. 6-1-12; revised 7-24-25.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.